Washington statutes.
RCW 4.16.180

Statute tolled by absence from state, concealment, etc.

If the cause of action shall accrue against any person who is a nonresident of this state, or who is a resident of this state and shall be out of the state, or concealed therein, such action may be commenced within the terms herein respectively limited after the coming, or return of such person into the state, or after the end of such concealment; and if after such cause of action shall have accrued, such person shall depart from and reside out of this state, or conceal himself or herself, the time of his or her absence or concealment shall not be deemed or taken as any part of the time limit for the commencement of such action.

[ 2011 c 336 s 84; 1927 c 132 s 1; Code 1881 s 36; 1854 p 364 s 10; RRS s 168.]